Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,220
Registration, rules, regulations, and orders under prior law; effect.

(1) The repeal of Chapter 60, article 3, as it existed on September 4, 2005, and the enactment of the Motor Vehicle Registration Act is not intended to affect the validity of the registration of any motor vehicle, trailer, or snowmobile or the validity of any license plate, permit, renewal tab, or tonnage sticker issued under Chapter 60, article 3, and in existence on such date. All such license plates, permits, renewal tabs, and tonnage stickers are valid under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act as if registration had taken place under such act.

(2) The rules, regulations, and orders of the Director of Motor Vehicles and the Department of Motor Vehicles issued under Chapter 60, article 3, shall remain in effect as if issued under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act unless changed or eliminated by the director or the department to the extent such power is statutorily granted to the director and department.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 220.